Utah statutes.
10-2-607.   Notice of election.
If the county legislative bodies find that the resolution or petition for
consolidation and their attachments substantially conform with the
requirements of this part, they shall give notice of the election for
consolidation to the electors of each municipality which would become part of
the consolidated municipality by publication:
(1)  in a newspaper having a general circulation within the boundaries of each
municipality to be consolidated at least once a week for four consecutive
weeks prior to the election on the question of consolidation; and
(2)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for four weeks.
